Hawaii statutes.
[§201-112] Hawaii television and film
development board. (a) There is established the Hawaii television and
film development board. The board shall be attached to the department of
business, economic development, and tourism for administrative purposes only.
The board shall administer the grant and venture capital investment programs
and the Hawaii television and film development special fund established under
this part. The board shall also assess and consider the overall viability and
development of the television and film industries and make recommendations to
appropriate state or county agencies.

(b) The board shall be composed of nine
members, four of whom shall be appointed by the governor pursuant to section
26-34, and all of whom shall serve four-year staggered terms. One of the
governor's appointments shall be made from a list of nominees submitted by the
president of the senate and another appointment shall be made from a list of
nominees submitted by the speaker of the house of representatives. The four
appointed members shall possess a current working knowledge of the film,
television, or entertainment industry. The director of business, economic
development, and tourism, and the chairs of the four county film commissions or
its equivalent, shall serve as ex officio voting members, who may be
represented on the board by designees.

The chairperson and vice chairperson of the
board shall be selected by the board by majority vote. Five members shall
constitute a quorum, whose affirmative vote shall be necessary for all actions
by the board. The members shall serve without compensation but shall be
reimbursed for expenses, including travel expenses, necessary for the
performance of their duties.

(c) The film industry branch development manager
shall serve as the executive secretary of the board.

(d) The board may adopt rules pursuant to
chapter 91 to effectuate the purposes of this part. [L 2000, c 285, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next